Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-901
Lien; scope.

Any person who furnishes gasoline, diesel fuel, tractor fuel, oil, grease, or other petroleum products to another to be used in farm machinery for power or lubricating purposes in the production of any agricultural crop shall be entitled to a lien upon all such crops produced and owned by the person to whom such fuel or lubricant was furnished to secure the payment of the purchase price thereof, upon compliance with sections 52-901 to 52-904.

Laws 1957, c. 226, § 1, p. 775;

Laws 2001, LB 54, § 9.

Cattle may not be included within the meaning of "crops" as set out in statute providing that any person who furnishes petroleum products to another to be used in farm machinery for the production of any agricultural crops shall be entitled to a lien upon all such crops produced. O'Neill Production Credit Assn. v. Schnoor, 208 Neb. 105, 302 N.W.2d 376 (1981).